pathway/XeLaTexConvert/XeLaTexExe/share/texmf/tex/generic/hyphen/ishyph.tex
tsj4
t1sk4
ts1s
t1st4
ts4u
t2sy
tt3a'd
ttak4i
ttar5f
tt5'a
tte5r'i
tt5ern
t4t'i
tt5j
tt1l
tt1or
tt3r"x
tt3ug
tt4ugl
ttv4
t1t"x
t1u
4tu.
t4u'di
tugl4
tuk4
tu3l4i'd
tum2
tu5min
t2ung
3t4ungl
tup4
t3ur3e
tur3k
t5urs
t4usa
t4usu
tutr4
t'ud3
t3'u'd
t'u4l
1t'un
t'un4a
t1'ur
t'u3sk
t1v
5tveggj
t5ver
5t'ys
t1't
3t"xk
1t"ok
1t"ol
t5"ols
2u1a
u3af
u5au
2u1'a4
u'a"xtl4
4u1b4
4uc
4ud4
u1da
u5d'a
u3de
u3d'o
u3dr
2u'da
u'd4are
u'd3k4
2u'dl
u'dm4
2u'd4n
2u'dr
u'd5ris
u'd4se
u'd3sv
u'd5s"x
4u'dul
2u5e
4u'e
4uf
uf5'a
ufd4
u5fit
u3fj
u1fr
u3ful
u5f'u
2ug
4ugal
4ugat
4uge
4ugil
4u1gj
4ugla
ug1lj
4uglu
ug4n
4ug'o
u5gran
4ugre
4ugrj
4ugr'o
ug3r"x
ug3ta
4ug"o
4u1h
4ui
u5i'd
4u'i4
2uj
2uk
ukak4
uk4as
u1ke
u5kinnin
ukku3s
u5k'o
u3kv
2ul
3ul.
4u1lag
ul3ar
3ulb
4ule
u5lind
ul4is
u1l'i
ul3k2
ul4la
4ulln
ullt4
4u3lo
u3l'o
ul5sv
ult4i
ul3us
ul5v4
u3l"x
4u1l"o
3um.
2uma
umak4
u1man
um4aran
2um'a
um'al4ar
um4ba
um5b"x
um4b"o
2umd
2ume
um3ein
4umi
umj4
um4ki
4uml
umm4a
4u5mo
2um'o
4ump
2umr
ums4
um3sl
3umst.
um1t4
4umu
um5unn
4um'u
2umy
2um'y
2um"x
2um"o
un3ar1
unar5a
un2as
4unat
2u1nau
2un'a
2und
4une
4unk
2unn'a
4unns
2unnu
unn5ug
4uno
4un'o
uns4an
4unt
1unu
4unur
4un"x
4un"o
2u3o
uol4
4u'o
2up
upp1
upp5a
uppal5
upp4i
3ur.
2ura
ura4f
ur5a4m
ur2an
ur5anna
2ur'a
ur'da5r'a
2ure
u1rek
ur3ey
4u1r'e
urf4a
ur3fl
urg4e
ur3gj
ur5in
4urit
4ur'i
u3r'ik
ur3j4
urk4a
ur1m
ur3n'i
4uro
4ur'o
ur1sk4
ur3sna
ur4sta
ur4sv"o
ur5til
urt4ir
ur1u
ur4unn
4urus
ur3v4
ur4vis
4uryk
4ur'y
2ur"x
4ur"o
2usa
u3sal
4us4'a
2use
4us'i
2usj
4u1sk
4usl
2u3s4m
2usn
4uso
4us'o
4usp
u5starf
4ust'a
4uste
2ust'e
2usti
2ust'i
4usto
4ust'o
4ustr
3ustu.
2ust'u
4usty
4ust'y
4ust"x
4ust"o
u5sund
4u3sv
4usy
2us'y
2us"o
2ut
ut3a'd
ut2as
u3te
u5til
u3t'o
ut4st'o
ut2'u
u1t"x
2u3u
4u5'u
4u3v
2uy
u3yf
2u1't
4u"x
2u5"o
'u1a
'ual4
'u3arf
'ub3an
'ubli3
'u'd3ar
'u'd5g
'u3e
'uf5ar
'ufl2
'uf5li
'uf5ly
'ufs4'a
'u5gala
'ug'o3
'u4g"x
4'u1i
'uk1l
'ukr1u
'uk4s
'ul5er
5'ul4f
'ulf5al
'ul4'i3
'ul'ip4
'u3lo
4'u2m
'um4r
'um4si
'u4n
'und4ug
'un4g"o
'upl5i
'ur5ef
'ur'it4
'ur5sl
'ur1t
'ur3un
'ur5v
'u3r"x
2'us
'u4sa
'us3ei
'us3'i
'us4sti
'us4sv
'us1v
'ut3e
'ut2he
'uti5f
'ut2is
'utj4
'ut1l2
'ut1r
4'u1u
'u1v
'u4va
'u5't
v2a2
va'dr5
va5fo
va5h
5vallag
va4n
var4ma
varps3
var5'u
var4v
v3ast
va4t
3vax
ve'd5l
ve3fe
1veg
v2ei
3vei'd
vein4as
5veis
4velg
2vep
v4er
1ver'd
ver3gj
3verk
ver2s
v'e2
v5'es
v3'et5
2v3h
v2i
2vi.
v4i'd
5vi'dar
vi'd3l
vil4i
vi3li'd
3viln
vi4lo
vin3gj
4vip
3virk
visk5un
3viss
vis4v
5vita
vitk5
vit2n
4viv
4v'ib
2v'i'd
5v'ik
3v'isi
v'isl3a
v'i1v
2vn
vo3k
vol4
vork4
vor4r
4vr1
4vs
2vu
v1u'd
v1un
5v"xg
wa4
win4s4
x5ar
x2as
x3e
x3f
x5i
xis4
x'i3
x'ik4
x5'iu
xt5a'd
x1u4
y5ba
y'd2s
yf5a
yf1i
yfj5a'd
yft4is
y1i
yj3ar
yj5'o
yk5e
yk3i
yk3su
yk3u
yk3v
ylf5i
ylgn4
yll5a
yl4v
ym3a
ymp5'i
y4n
ynj5ar
ynj3'o
yn4k
yn4t
yn5u
yp2us
yr5e
yr1i
yr3il
yrir3
yrj3
yrkv3a
yr2l
yr2s
yr1u
y2s
ysj3
ys2s
yst3ug
yt4h
ytil4
yt4k
y3v
'y5a
'yaf5
'y5'a
'y'd2s
'yfl4
'y3flu
'yg4r
'yg4u'd
'y1i
'yja5f4
'ym4a
'ym4k
'ypru4
'yp2s
'yrf4
'yri3m
'yri5p4
'yr3l
'y4si
'ysig4
'ys4l
'ys4m
'y3st'a
'y5u
'y5'u
'y3v
'y5y
z'o4
't2a
'tam4
'tarf5a
'tar4m
4'tb
't2i
'tist3i
'tj'o4
'tol5a
'tor3f4
'tor3g
'torm4
't1'ol
3't'or
't'or5i
't2r2
'tra4
'tr'as4
'tris4
'tr'il4
'tr'i3t
'tru4
'tum5a
'tumb3
'tur2
't'us3
't2v
'tver5sk
"x1b
"x'dn5
"x'dnis5
"x'd2s
"x'd4ug
4"xf
"xf1a
"x4fi
"xf3ust
"xg5ist
"x1i
"xj3
"xj4al
"xjark4
"xk1a
"xk1li
"xk3u
"x2l
"xl3an
"xl3e
"xl3us
"xm3a
"xm4al
"x4mundu
"xnak4
"xn4k
"xr1a
"xr3e
"xrg"ong5
"xrif4
"xr3ist
"xri3sv
"xr3l
"xr4n
"xr2s
"xr5un
"xr1us
"x5r'u
"xs4is
"xt5ise
"xtl5i
"x5u
"xva5g
"x5val
"xv3ar
"xv4ara
"x3ve
"xv3in
"o'd2
"o'dl3
"o'dm5
"o'd3un
"o'dv5an
"o'dv3ar
"o1fa
"ofl3'o
"ofn5
"ofr3u
"of3u
"o4g
"og3gj
"oggv3
"og1re
"og2us
"ok5e
"ok5r'a
"ok3st
"ok3ul
"okv3a
"o4l
"ol1f4
"olk2
"olu5mi
"ol5un
"ol2v
"olv5an
"om4b
"om3u
"ond4l
"ong5sv
"ong4us
"ong4v
"ongv3a
"onk3
"onn4l
"on3ug
"on5un
"or1e
"or4ge
"or4lan
"orm5un
"or3'o
"or3ug
"or1un
"or3und
"orus4
"or2v
4"orva
"orv5al
"orv5an
"orv5ar
"orv4i
"or1y
"or5"x
"o4s
"osk3ul
"os3u
"ot4s
"o3tug
"ot2v
"otv3a
"o5u
"4x
"4o
'4t
'4d
'4a
'4e
'4i
'4o
'4u
'4y
}
